Utah statutes.
41-1a-1211.   License plate fees -- Application fees for issuance and renewal of personalized and special group license plates -- Replacement fee for license plates -- Postage fees.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (11) and (12), a license plate fee established in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 shall be paid to the division for the issuance of any new license plate under Part 4, License Plates and Registration Indicia.

(b)  The license plate fee shall be deposited as follows:

(i)  $1 in the Transportation Fund; and

(ii)  the remainder of the fee charged under Subsection (1)(a), as provided in Section 41-1a-1201.

(2)  An applicant for original issuance of personalized license plates issued under Section 41-1a-410 shall pay a $50 per set license plate application fee in addition to the fee required in Subsection (1).

(3)  Beginning July 1, 2003, a person who applies for a special group license plate shall pay a $5 fee for the original set of license plates in addition to the fee required under Subsection (1).

(4)  An applicant for original issuance of personalized special group license plates shall pay the license plate application fees required in Subsection (2) in addition to the license plate fees and license plate application fees established under Subsections (1) and (3).

(5)  An applicant for renewal of personalized license plates issued under Section 41-1a-410 shall pay a $10 per set application fee.

(6) (a)  The division may charge a fee established under Section 63J-1-504 to recover the costs for the replacement of any license plate issued under Part 4, License Plates and Registration Indicia.

(b)  The license plate fee shall be deposited as follows:

(i)  $1 in the Transportation Fund; and

(ii)  the remainder of the fee charged under Subsection (6)(a), as provided in Section 41-1a-1201.

(7)  The division may charge a fee established under Section 63J-1-504 to recover its costs for the replacement of decals issued under Section 41-1a-418.

(8)  The division may charge a fee established under Section 63J-1-504 to recover the cost of issuing stickers under Section 41-1a-416.

(9)  In addition to any other fees required by this section, the division shall assess a fee established under Section 63J-1-504 to cover postage expenses if new or replacement license plates are mailed to the applicant.

(10)  The fees required under this section are separate from and in addition to registration fees required under Section 41-1a-1206.

(11) (a)  An applicant for a license plate issued under Section 41-1a-407 is not subject to the license plate fee under Subsection (1).

(b)  An applicant for a Purple Heart special group license plate issued in accordance with Section 41-1a-421 is exempt from the fees under Subsections (1), (3), and (7).

(12)  A person is exempt from the fee under Subsection (1) or (6) if the person:

(a)  was issued a clean fuel special group license plate in accordance with Section 41-1a-418 prior to the effective date of rules made by the Department of Transportation under Subsection 41-6a-702(5)(b);

(b)  beginning on the effective date of rules made by the Department of Transportation authorized under Subsection 41-6a-702(5)(b), is no longer eligible for a clean fuel special group license plate under the rules made by the Department of Transportation; and

(c)  upon renewal or reissuance, is required to replace the clean fuel special group license plate with a new license plate.

(13)  Until June 30, 2011, a person is exempt from the license plate fee under Subsection (1) or (6) if the person:

(a)  was issued a firefighter recognition special group license plate in accordance with Section 41-1a-418 prior to July 1, 2009;

(b)  upon renewal of the person's vehicle registration on or after July 1, 2009, is not a contributor to the Firefighter Support Restricted Account as required under Section 41-1a-418; and

(c)  is required to replace the firefighter special group license plate with a new license plate in accordance with Section 41-1a-418.



Amended by Chapter 189, 2011 General Session

